Virginia statutes. Title 53.1. Prisons and Other Methods of Correction.
Article 1. Community Facilities for Parolees and Probationers.

§ 53.1-177.
Authority of Director; establishment of halfway houses; employment of personnel.

The Director is authorized to establish and maintain a system of halfway houses for the temporary care of adults who are placed on probation or released on parole and are determined to be eligible for this service. Such community facility may, in the discretion of the Director, be purchased, constructed or leased. The Director is further authorized to employ necessary personnel for these facilities.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-128.6; 1968, c. 298; 1974, cc. 44, 45; 1978, c. 492; 1982, c. 636.

§ 53.1-178.
Director to establish standards.

The Director shall establish minimum standards for the operation of the facilities authorized by §

53.1-177

. The Director shall maintain a list of approved halfway houses.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-128.5; 1968, c. 298; 1974, cc. 44, 45; 1978, c. 492; 1982, c. 636; 2020, c. 759.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 759 substituted “Director” for “Board” in the first sentence.

§ 53.1-179.
Purchase of services authorized.

The Director may purchase temporary room and board and training, counseling and rehabilitation services for probationers and parolees whom the Director deems to be in need of and eligible for such benefits and services. Implementation of this provision shall conform with the requirements of all locally-adopted zoning regulations.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-128.6; 1968, c. 298; 1974, cc. 44, 45; 1978, c. 492; 1982, c. 636; 2020, c. 759.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 759 deleted “pursuant to rules and regulations of the Board” preceding “may purchase.”